src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_SALBOIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SALBOIN-PL ;


!LEXICON N_ENIN !!≈ @CODE@ enin:eni
!!! Gradation NA
!!! Harmony: Front
!:n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
!        N_ENIN-SG  ;
!        N_ENIN-PL  ;

!LEXICON N_ENIN-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-SG ;

!LEXICON N_ENIN-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_UDAR !!≈ @CODE@ udar:udar
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_UDAR-SG  ;
        N_UDAR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_UDAR-SG
:%{back%} NMN_UDAR-SG ;

LEXICON N_UDAR-PL
:%{back%} NMN_UDAR-PL ;


LEXICON N_PIENAR !!≈ @CODE@ pienar:piendar
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_PIENAR-SG  ;
        N_PIENAR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_PIENAR-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PIENAR-SG ;

LEXICON N_PIENAR-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PIENAR-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TYTÄR !!≈ @CODE@ tytär:tyttär
!!! Gradation Yes
!!! Harmony: Front
!:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
!        N_TYTÄR-SG  ;
!        N_TYTÄR-PL  ;

!LEXICON N_TYTÄR-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_TYTÄR-SG ;

!LEXICON N_TYTÄR-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_TYTÄR-PL ;

!! ### NOMINAL DECLENSION BEGINS

!LEXICON NMN_MUAMO !!≈ @CODE@ muamo:muama
!!! Back vowel
!!! gradation NA
! NMN_MUAMO-SG ;
! NMN_MUAMO-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_MUAMO-SG
:%^A2O SGNOMSUF ;
 SGNOM/PXSP3 ;
 SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
LEXICON NMN_MUAMO-PL
 PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ;			! muamoloin
:%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_TUATTO !!≈ @CODE@ tuatto:tuatta
!! Back vowel
!! gradation Yes
! NMN_TUATTO-SG ;
! NMN_TUATTO-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_TUATTO-SG
:%^A2O SGNOMSUF ;
 SGNOM/PXSP3 ;
:%^WGStem SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
+Sg:%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;
LEXICON NMN_TUATTO-PL
:%^WGStem PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
:%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%>i%^WGStem PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%>i%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Pl:%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;

:%^A2O%>l%{oö%}i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ;			! tuattol%{oö%}in
:%^A2O%>l%{oö%}i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%^A2O%>l%{oö%}i%^WGStem PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%^A2O%>l%{oö%}i%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Pl:%^A2O%>l%{oö%}i OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;

!LEXICON NMN_DIÄDÖ !!≈ @CODE@ diädö:diädä
! NMN_DIÄDÖ-SG ;
! NMN_DIÄDÖ-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_DIÄDÖ-SG
:%^A2O SGNOMSUF ;
 SGNOM/PXSP3 ;
 SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
LEXICON NMN_DIÄDÖ-PL 
 PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
:%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY !!≈ @CODE@ muarju:muarja
!! gradation NA
 NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-SG ;
 NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-SG
:%^A2UÄ2Y SGNOMSUF ;
 SGNOM/PXSP3 ;
 SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
LEXICON NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL
 PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^A2O%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
:%^A2O%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%^A2O%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%^A2O%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_SUAJU/XX !!≈ @CODE@ muarju:muarja
!!! gradation NA
! NMN_SUAJU/XX-SG ;
! NMN_SUAJU/XX-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_SUAJU/XX-SG
:%^A2UÄ2Y SGNOMSUF ;
 SGNOM/PXSP3 ;
 SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
LEXICON NMN_SUAJU/XX-PL
 PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^A2O%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
:%^A2O%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%^A2O%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%^A2O%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
:%^RmVow%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
:%^RmVow%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%^RmVow%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%^RmVow%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_AKKU !!≈ @CODE@ akku:akka
!! gradation Yes
 NMN_AKKU-SG ;
 NMN_AKKU-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_AKKU-SG
:%^A2UÄ2Y SGNOMSUF ;
 SGNOM/PXSP3 ;
:%^WGStem SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
+Sg:%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;
LEXICON NMN_AKKU-PL
:%^WGStem PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^A2O%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
:%^A2O%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%^A2O%>i%^WGStem PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%^A2O%>i%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Pl:%^A2O%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;

LEXICON NMN_KNIIGU !!≈ @CODE@ kniigu:kniiga
!! gradation No
 NMN_KNIIGU-SG ;
 NMN_KNIIGU-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_KNIIGU-SG
:%^A2UÄ2Y SGNOMSUF ;
 SGNOM/PXSP3 ;
 SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
LEXICON NMN_KNIIGU-PL
 PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^A2O%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
:%^A2O%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%^A2O%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:%^A2O%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_LAPSI !!≈ @CODE@ lapsi:laps lapsi:laps
!        NMN_LAPSI-SG  ;
!	NMN_LAPSI-PL  ;

LEXICON NMN_LAPSI-SG
:i SGNOMSUF ;
:e SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^KS2S SGPARSUF_dU ;
+Sg:e OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
LEXICON NMN_LAPSI-PL
:e PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ; 
:%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
:%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_VEZI !!≈ @CODE@ vezi:ved
! NMN_VEZI-SG ;
! NMN_VEZI-PL ;

!LEXICON NMN_VEZI-SG
!:%^D2Z%>i SGNOMSUF ;
!:e%^WGStem SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
!: SGPARSUF_dU ;
!+Sg:e%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
!+Sg:e OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;

!LEXICON NMN_VEZI-PL
!:e%^WGStem PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:%^D2Z%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ;		! vezien
!!:%^D2Z%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
!:%^D2Z%>i PLINSSUF ;
!+Pl:%^D2Z%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!:%^D2Z%>i%>l%{oö%}i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ; 
!:%^D2Z%>i%>l%{oö%}i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
!:%^D2Z%>i%>l%{oö%}i PLINSSUF ;
!+Pl:%^D2Z%>i%>l%{oö%}i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_SUZI !!≈ @CODE@ suzi:su
! NMN_SUZI-SG ;
! NMN_SUZI-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_SUZI-SG
:z%>i SGNOMSUF ;
:ze SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:t SGPARSUF_dU ;
+Sg:ze OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_SUZI-PL
:ze PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
:z%>i%>l%{oö%}i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ; 
:z%>i%>l%{oö%}i PLPARSUF_i ;
:z%>i%>l%{oö%}i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:z%>i%>l%{oö%}i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!! ### NMN = Nominals mutually shared case marking for nouns, adjectives, proper ouns, numerals
LEXICON NMN_HANGI/NIMI
	NMN_HANGI/NIMI-SG	;
	NMN_HANGI/NIMI-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_HANGI/NIMI-SG
:i SGNOMSUF ;
:e SGPARSUF_A2 ;
:e SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Sg:e OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_HANGI/NIMI-PL
:e PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK	;
:%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ; 
:%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
:%>i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
:il%{oö%}i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ;
:il%{oö%}i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:il%{oö%}i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:il%{oö%}i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_YLE-SG
:e SGNOMSUF ;
:e SGPARSUF_A2 ;
:e SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Sg:e OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

LEXICON NMN_JÄLGI
!! Front Vowel
!! Gradation Yes
	NMN_JÄLGI-SG	;
	NMN_JÄLGI-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_JÄLGI-SG
:i SGNOMSUF ;
:e SGPARSUF_A2 ;
:e%^WGStem SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Sg:e%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Sg:e OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;

LEXICON NMN_JÄLGI-PL
:e%^WGStem PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK	;
:%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ; 
:%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
:%>i%^WGStem PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:i%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Pl:i OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;
:il%{oö%}i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ;
:il%{oö%}i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:il%{oö%}i PLINSSUF ;
+Pl:il%{oö%}i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;

!LEXICON NMN_JOGI !!≈ @CODE@ jogi:jog
!!! Back Vowel
!!! Gradation Yes
!	NMN_JOGI-SG	;
!	NMN_JOGI-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_JOGI-SG
:i SGNOMSUF ;
:e SGPARSUF_A2 ;
:e%^WGStem SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Sg:e%^WGStem OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-WEAK-GRADE ;
+Sg:e OBLIQUE-CASES-TYPICALLY-WITH-STRONG-GRADE ;
