src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
nuorižojoukkoviestimet+N:nuorižo#joukko#viesti N_SALBOIN-PL  "nuorisojoukkoviestimet" ;
ottotytär+N:otto#tyttär N_PIENAR  "ottotytär" ;
pienar+N:piendar N_PIENAR  "piennar" ;
pizar+N:pizar N_PIENAR  "pisara" ;
pästär+N:pästär N_PIENAR  "päistäreet" ;
ristintytär+N:ristintyttär N_PIENAR  "kummityttö" ;
sagar+N:sagar N_PIENAR  "saranat" ;
saivar+N:saivar N_PIENAR  "saivare" ;
sammal+N:sammal N_PIENAR  "sammal" ;
sevoitar+N:sevoitar N_PIENAR  "serkku (sekä mies- että naispuolinen)" ;
sizär+N:sizär N_PIENAR  "sisar" ;
suarintytär+N:suarin#tyttär N_PIENAR  "tsaarin tytär" ;
tanner+N:tanner N_PIENAR  "tanner" ;
tytär+N:tyttär N_PIENAR  "tytär" ;
udar+N:udar N_UDAR  "utare" ;
